Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.310

Information pamphlet.

(1) After a public hearing, the department of fish and wildlife shall publish a pamphlet on firearms safety and the legal limits of the use of firearms. The pamphlet shall include current information on firearms laws and regulations and state preemption of local firearms laws. By July 1, 2017, the department of fish and wildlife shall update the pamphlet to incorporate information on suicide awareness and prevention as recommended by the safe homes task force established in *RCW 43.70.445.

(2) This pamphlet may be used in the department's hunter safety education program and shall be provided to the department of licensing for distribution to firearms dealers and persons authorized to issue concealed pistol licenses. The department of fish and wildlife shall reimburse the department of licensing for costs associated with distribution of the pamphlet.

[ 2016 c 90 s 4; 1994 c 264 s 2; 1988 c 36 s 4; 1985 c 428 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.70.445 expired July 1, 2021.

Findings—2016 c 90: See note following RCW 43.70.442.

Severability—1985 c 428: See note following RCW 9.41.290.